District of Columbia statutes.
47-1096

N Street Village, Inc., Lot 93, Square 242.

[Not funded].

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-229, § 2(b), 62 DCR 276

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2 of the N Street Village, Inc. Tax and TOPA Exemption Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-191, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14232).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-229, § 3(a), see § 3 of the N Street Village, Inc. Tax and TOPA Exemption Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-191, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14232).